Arkansas, session 2025, SB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-101-102, concerning definitions within
the Arkansas Veterinary Medical Practice Act and relating to the practice of
veterinary medicine, is amended to add additional subdivisions to read as
follows:
(21) "Large animal" means an animal that is livestock as defined
by 7 U.S.C. § 1471, as existing on January 1, 2025, or is classified as a
Category II animal under the National Veterinary Accreditation Program;
(22) "Small animal" means an animal that is classified as a
Category I animal under the National Veterinary Accreditation Program,
including without limitation a dog, cat, rat, mouse, gerbil, guinea pig,
hamster, ferret, hedgehog, or lizard; and
(23)(A) "Veterinary telemedicine" means the practice of
veterinary medicine in which the animal patient care, treatment, and services
are provided by electronic communication, including telephone and audio-
visual technology, consistent with the veterinarian's professional judgment.
(B) "Veterinary telemedicine" includes providing:
*JMB009*
01/14/2025 2:26:15 PM JMB009

SB61
(i) Health information, opinion, guidance, or
recommendation that is not specific to a particular animal; or
(ii) A timely assessment and decision as to whether
to immediately refer an animal patient to a veterinarian for emergency or
urgent care.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 101, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-101-104. Veterinary telemedicine standards.
(a) Only a licensed veterinarian shall provide veterinary telemedicine
to an animal patient located in this state.
(b) In an emergency or urgent situation, a licensed veterinarian may
provide veterinary telemedicine without previously establishing a
veterinarian-client-patient relationship if the licensed veterinarian
establishes a veterinarian-client-patient relationship within:
(1) Seven (7) calendar days after providing the veterinary
telemedicine services for a small animal; or
(2) Twenty-one (21) calendar days after providing the veterinary
telemedicine services for a large animal.

















01/14/2025 2:26:15 PM JMB009